Maine, session 132, LD1907.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 10 MRSA §1202, sub-§4-A is enacted to read:
4-A. Dynamic pricing. "Dynamic pricing" means a digital process that uses a
software program to determine or change the price of a good or service displayed on an
electronic shelf label in a grocery store.
Sec. 2. 10 MRSA §1202, sub-§4-B is enacted to read:
4-B. Electronic shelf label. "Electronic shelf label" means a digital label or price tag
that displays the price of a good or service offered by a grocery store.
Sec. 3. 10 MRSA §1202, sub-§4-C is enacted to read:
4-C. Grocery store. "Grocery store" means a store that is part of a chain with 15 or
more locations nationally doing business under the same name or as part of a corporation
that is primarily engaged in the retail sale of canned food, dry goods, frozen food, dairy
products, fresh fruits and vegetables and fresh meats, fish and poultry. "Grocery store"
includes a convenience store, but does not include a separately owned eating establishment
located within a grocery store.
Sec. 4. 10 MRSA §1204-B is enacted to read:
§1204-B. Certain dynamic pricing prohibited; notice
1. Prohibition. A grocery store may not engage in dynamic pricing more than once
in a 48-hour period during a severe weather event, a natural disaster, a supply chain
disruption or another event that can cause a sudden increased demand for goods or services.
2. Allowable use; notice. Except as prohibited pursuant to subsection 1, a grocery
store may use dynamic pricing if it provides notice to its customers using conspicuous
signage indicating:
A. That dynamic pricing is being used in the grocery store and how it works;
B. What factors are used by the grocery store to change the price of a good or service;
and
C. That it is an unfair or deceptive trade practice to use dynamic pricing more than
once in a 48-hour period during a severe weather event, a natural disaster, a supply
chain disruption or another event that can cause a sudden increased demand for goods
or services.
3. Violation is unfair trade practice. A grocery store engaging in dynamic pricing
in violation of this section commits an unfair trade practice under Title 5, chapter 10.